Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Organization

§ 17-20-201.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-202.
Articles of incorporation.

In addition to the requirements set forth in W.S.

17-19-202

, each corporation organized under this act shall state, in its articles, that it is a cooperative utility.

Each corporation incorporating under this act shall be considered a mutual benefit corporation and shall be subject to provisions governing mutual benefit corporations found in the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, except as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b), see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act. —

See §§

17-19-101

and 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

Articles 3 through 5. [Reserved]